Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 12. Designated Transfer of Lands

§ 36-8-1201.
Sale of land to town of Guernsey.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey its right, title and interest, in the surface estate of the following described parcel of land to the town of Guernsey: That part of the NE1/4 and NE1/4 SE1/4 of Section 34, Township 27 North, Range 66 West of the 6th P.M., Platte County, Wyoming, more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the North Quarter corner of said Section 34 and considering the north line of the NE1/4 thereof to bear East, with all bearings herein being relative thereto; thence East along said north line, a distance of 1,092.12 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING said point being on the westerly right-of-way line of the Burlington Northern Railroad; thence southeasterly, along said westerly right-of-way line, on the arc of a nontangent 01°18´11" curve to the left, a distance of 132.08 feet (said curve having a central angle of 01°43´15" and a long chord that bears South 75°22´41" East, 132.07 feet); thence South 76°14´19" East, along said westerly right-of-way line, a distance of 78.86 feet to a point on the west line of the NE1/4 NE1/4 of said Section 34; thence South, along said westerly right-of-way line, and on the west line of said NE1/4 NE1/4, a distance of 25.74 feet; thence South 76°14´19" East, along said westerly right-of-way line, a distance of 805.55 feet to a point 120 feet west of the west bank of the North Platte River; thence South 03°03´30" East, a distance of 2,664.74 feet to a point 120 feet west of the west bank of the North Platte River and on the centerline of U.S. Highway No. 26; thence North 89°58´23" West, along the centerline of said U.S. Highway No. 26, a distance of 581.53 feet; thence North 13°09´42" West, a distance of 2,900.94 feet; thence North 47°01´21" East, a distance of 154.6 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 53.53 acres, more or less and subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now exist thereon. Subject to a 100 foot right-of-way easement along U.S. Highway No. 26.

The conveyance authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be by sale at an appraised value, with terms of the sale to be determined by the board of land commissioners and governing body of the town of Guernsey.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 181, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 181, § 2, authorizes the board of land commissioners to convey the surface estate interest in specified state lands to the department of state parks and cultural resources for inclusion into Guernsey State Park.

§ 36-8-1202.
Sale of land to town of Newcastle.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey, its right, title and interest, in the surface estate of the following described parcels of land to the town of Newcastle: Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Block 1, Washington Park Addition; Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Block 2, Washington Park Addition; Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Block 3, Washington Park Addition; Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Block 5, Washington Park Addition; Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of Block 6, Washington Park Addition; and Lots 1 and 2 of Block 7, Washington Park Addition; within the town of Newcastle, Wyoming, subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now exist thereon.

The conveyance authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be by sale at an appraised value, with terms of the sale to be determined by the board of land commissioners and the governing body of the town of Newcastle.

The office of state lands and investments shall prepare all deeds and documents necessary to complete the transaction. All costs associated with the land appraisal, title insurance and closing shall be paid by the town of Newcastle.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 86, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 86, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 36-8-1203.
Sale of land to Uinta County.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey, subject to section 2 of this act, its right, title and interest, in the surface estate of the following described parcel of land to Uinta County: A tract of land located in the S1/2 N1/2 and the S1/2 of Section 23, and Section 26, of Township 15 North, Range 120 West, 6th P.M., Uinta County, being more particularly described as follows: BEGINNING at the Southeast corner of said Section 26, a steel bar w/ 3-1/4" aluminum cap inscribed “Uinta Engineering and Surveying Cloey C. Wall PLS 482 1998”, and running thence S 89°55´20" W, 2640.31 feet along the south line thereof to the South one-quarter corner of said Section 26; thence N 89°50´59" W, 876.90 feet along the South line of said Section 26 to the Southeast corner of that Tract of land described by Warranty Deed recorded in Book 882 on Page 82 of the Uinta County Records (Hurdsman Tract), said corner monumented with a steel bar with aluminum cap inscribed “Cloey Wall LS 482”; thence N 29°28´37" W, 3600.73 feet along the easterly line of said Hurdsman Tract to the Northernmost corner thereof, said corner lying on the west line of said Section 26, and being monumented with a steel bar with aluminum cap inscribed “Cloey Wall LS 482”; thence N 0°01´49" E, 2137.49 feet along the west line of said Section 26 to the Northwest corner thereof, said corner monumented with an iron pipe w/ 3" brass cap inscribed “CC Wall RLS 482 1976”; thence N 0°11´49" E, 2647.42 feet along the west line of said Section 23 to the West one-quarter corner thereof, said corner monumented with an iron pipe w/ 3" brass cap inscribed “Cloey C Wall LS 482 1974”; thence N 0°04´54" E, 1050.99 feet along the west line of said Section 23 to the southerly right-of-way of Interstate Highway No. 80; thence S 82°12´36" E, 625.13 feet along said Interstate 80 right-of-way to a point on the southerly right-of-way of old U.S. Highway No. 30; thence S 7°46´24" W, 81.66 feet along said U.S. 30 right-of-way to a point lying on a curve to the right having a radius of 22659.11 feet, from which point a radial line bears S 7°46´24" W, said point being monumented with a standard Wyoming Highway Department concrete right-of-way monument; thence southeasterly 2438.77 feet along the arc of said curve and said Highway 30 right-of-way through a central angle of 6°10'00", the long chord of which bears S 79°08´36" E, 2437.59 feet, to a point tangent, said point being monumented with a steel bar with 1-1/2" aluminum cap inscribed “Ted Taggart PLS 6953”; thence S 76°03´36" E, 596.06 feet along said U.S. 30 right-of-way to a point monumented with a steel bar with 1-1/2" aluminum cap inscribed “Ted Taggart PLS 6953”; thence N 13°56´24" E, 100.00 feet along said U.S. 30 right-of-way to a point monumented with a steel bar with 1-1/2" aluminum cap inscribed “Ted Taggart PLS 6953”; thence S 76°03´36" E, 1684.16 feet along said U.S. 30 right-of-way to a point on the east line of said Section 23, said point being monumented with a steel bar with 1-1/2" aluminum cap inscribed “Ted Taggart PLS 6953”; thence S 0°09´38" E, 2600.15 feet along the east line of said Section 23 to the Southeast corner thereof, said corner being monumented with a steel bar with 3-1/4" aluminum cap inscribed “Wasatch Surveying Ted T Taggart PLS 6953 2003”; thence S 0°21´11" E, 2645.67 feet along the east line of said Section 26 to the East one-quarter corner thereof, said corner being monumented with a steel bar w/ 3-1/4" aluminum cap inscribed “Uinta Engineering and Surveying Cloey C. Wall PLS 482 1991”; thence S 0°18´33" E, 2646.48 feet along the east line of said Section 26 to the POINT OF BEGINNING; said tract containing 956.567 acres, more or less, and subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now exist thereon.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey, subject to section 2 of this act, its right, title and interest, in the surface estate of the following described parcel of land to Uinta County: A tract of land located in the N1/2 NW1/4 of Section 23, Township 15 North, Range 120 West, 6th P.M., Uinta County being more particularly described as follows: BEGINNING at the Northwest corner of said Section, the original stone monument, and running thence N 89°45´09" E, 1686.77 feet along the north line thereof to the Northwest corner of that tract of land described by Quitclaim Deed recorded in Book 541 on Page 46 of the Uinta County Records (Uinta County Tract), said corner monumented with a 5/8" steel bar; thence S 8°57´34" E, 994.33 feet along the westerly boundary of said Uinta County Tract to the Northwest corner of that Exception Tract contained within said Quitclaim Deed; thence S 82°01´39" E, 116.21 feet along the boundary of said Exception Tract; thence S 15°52´43" W, 99.87 feet along the boundary of said Exception Tract; thence S 74°05´51" E, 367.79 feet along the boundary of said Exception Tract to the westerly right-of-way of Uinta County Road No. 109; thence S 15°54´44" W, 80.00 feet along the boundary of said Exception Tract and said right-of-way to the Northeast corner of that tract of land described by Quitclaim Deed recorded in Book 834 on Page 143 of said Records (Taggart Tract), said corner monumented with a 1" diameter steel pipe; thence N 74°05´51" W, 447.74 feet along the boundary of said Exception Tract and the North line of said Taggart Tract to the Northwest corner thereof, said corner lying on the easterly line of that tract of land described by Warranty Deed recorded in Book 787 on Page 283 of said Records (GCP, LLC Tract), said corner monumented with a 1" diameter steel pipe; thence N 15°52´43" E, 88.00 feet along the easterly line of said GCP, LLC Tract to the Northeast corner thereof, said corner monumented with a steel bar with aluminum cap inscribed “Cloey Wall LS 482”; thence N 81°21´12" W, 933.92 feet along the North line of said GCP, LLC Tract to the Northwest corner thereof, said corner monumented with a steel bar with aluminum cap inscribed “Cloey Wall LS 482”; thence S 7°47´24" W, 399.84 feet along the westerly line of said GCP, LLC Tract to the northerly right-of-way of Interstate Highway No. 80; thence N 82°12´36" W, 203.13 feet along said right-of-way to a standard Wyoming Transportation Department monument; thence N 7°47´24" E, 50.00 feet along said right-of-way to a standard Wyoming Transportation Department monument; thence N 82°12´36" W, 690.65 feet to the West line of said Section; thence N 0°04´54" E, 1142.53 feet along said West line to the POINT OF BEGINNING; said tract containing 45.928 acres, more or less and subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now exist thereon.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey, subject to section 2 of this act, its right, title and interest, in the surface estate of the following described parcel of land to Uinta County: That tract of land described in subsection (a) of this section, excluding those lands designated as Bear River State park pursuant to W.S. 36-8-902(a) and subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now exist thereon.

The conveyances authorized in this section shall be by sale at fair market value as determined by an appraisal.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 94, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

added “excluding those lands designated as Bear River State park pursuant to
W.S. 36-8-902(a)” in (c).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

The legal descriptions in this section are set forth as corrected by the Legislative Service Office to reflect the legal survey conducted pursuant to 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 2.

Laws 2007, ch. 94, §§ 2, 3 provides:

“It is the intent of this bill to convey the state owned, nontrust land in sections 23 and 26 of Township 15 North, Range 120 West of the 6th P.M. described above.
After passage of the bill, the office of state lands and investments shall prepare a fair market value appraisal of the identified land and shall commission a survey of the property by a licensed Wyoming surveyor in order to establish the legal descriptions of the land being conveyed by this bill.
The office of state lands and investments shall order a title insurance policy covering the surface estate and a mineral title search of all interests in the mineral estate in order to guarantee acceptable title of the lands being transferred by this act. The office of state lands and investments shall prepare all deeds and documents necessary to complete the transaction.
All costs associated with the land appraisal, survey, title insurance and closing shall be paid by Uinta County.
The legislative service office is directed to correct the legal descriptions contained in section 1 of this act to conform to the legal description established by the survey.

“Any payments made to the state by Uinta County relating to the land conveyance under this section shall be deposited in the state hospital permanent land fund.”

This section was renumbered as §

36-8-1203

as directed by the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 94, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 36-8-1204.
Fort Bridger state historic site; acceptance of lands.

The legislature authorizes the acceptance of the following lands to be included in the Fort Bridger state historic site managed by the department of state parks and historic sites upon final negotiation with Uinta County: Township 16 North, Range 115 West, NW1/4 of the SE1/4 of the SW1/4 of Section 33, the North 30´ of Carter Avenue, between Block 15 and Block 6 of the Carter’s Addition to Fort Bridger as said plat is recorded in the Uinta County Records office.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 5, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 5, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.